New York, session 2025-2026, A9482.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 398-f of the social services law, as added by a 2 chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the social services law relating to 3 requiring the office of children and family services to provide luggage 4 to youth in foster care, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5 3781 and A. 5434, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 398-f. Duty to provide luggage to children in foster [children] 7 care. 1. [Definitions.] For the purposes of this section, [the following 8 terms shall have the following meanings: 9 (a) "Demographic information" means race or ethnicity, gender, commu- 10 nity district, primary language, and any other category the office of 11 children and family services deems relevant. 12 (b) "Foster care agency" means the voluntary agency contracted by 13 social services districts to provide foster care. 14 (c) "Luggage"] "luggage" means a durable suitcase, duffel bag, back- 15 pack, or similar reusable container that is new or is in new-like condi- 16 tion, and is designed to hold an individual's personal belongings and is 17 not a disposable bag, trash bag, or cardboard box. 18 2. [Foster youth luggage. The office of children and family services] 19 Each local social services district shall [procure, distribute, and] 20 supply luggage to children in foster care [youth] who do not have appro- 21 priate luggage of their own [and who are: (a) entering foster care; (b) 22 moving from one foster care placement to another; (c) exiting foster 23 care; (d) moving to college; or (e) in any other situation where luggage 24 is needed]. If any child in foster care [youth] reports that their 25 luggage has been lost, stolen, or damaged, the [office of children and 26 family services shall] local social services district may provide 27 replacement luggage at [their] its discretion. Any luggage provided by EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07383-03-6 A. 9482 2 1 the [office of children and family services] local social services 2 district may not be reclaimed or retained by the office of children and 3 family services, the local social services districts, [foster care] 4 voluntary authorized agencies, or the child's foster parent. 5 3. [Partnership with social services districts. The office of children 6 and family services shall distribute new luggage to social services 7 districts based on the number of foster children in each locality. Each 8 social services district shall distribute new luggage to children within 9 the office of children and family services' care and custody or care and 10 guardianship, as well as to any voluntary agencies within their juris- 11 dictions with whom they contract for the provision of foster care 12 services. 13 4. Foster youth luggage reporting. No later than December first of 14 each year, the office of children and family services shall submit a 15 report to the governor and the legislature detailing the provision of 16 luggage to foster care youth. Such report shall include, but need not be 17 limited to, the following information: 18 (a) The total number of foster care youth given luggage, in total and 19 disaggregated by demographic information; 20 (b) To the extent there are foster care youth utilizing disposable 21 bags, trash bags, or cardboard boxes in place of luggage to transport 22 their belongings, the number of such foster care youth utilizing such 23 disposable bags, trash bags, or cardboard boxes, in total and disaggre- 24 gated by demographic information, and the reason such youth are utiliz- 25 ing such disposable bag, trash bag, or cardboard box; and 26 (c) The supply, cost, and inventory management procedures for the 27 office of children and family services' luggage supply.] Eligible 28 expenditures made by a local social services district for luggage for 29 children in foster care under this section shall be subject to state 30 reimbursement under the foster care block grant in accordance with 31 section one hundred fifty-three-k of this chapter. 32 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 33 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the social services law 34 relating to requiring the office of children and family services to 35 provide luggage to youth in foster care, as proposed in legislative 36 bills numbers S. 3781 and A. 5434, takes effect.